Tennessee, session 114, SB0182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. By January 1, 2026, the department of health shall submit a report
concerning the practice of anesthesiology in this state to the chair of the committee of the house
of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matters pertaining to health and the chair of the
health and welfare committee of the senate. The report must, at a minimum, include data
concerning how many anesthesiologists are practicing in this state, how many persons are
currently engaged in anesthesiology residencies in this state, how many persons are graduating
from educational programs in anesthesiology in this state, and suggestions on how to increase
the number of anesthesiologists in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0182
000370
- 1 -